thudiniska.foma
### thudiniska.foma ###

# natural classes

define V [ a | e | i | o | u ] ;
define D [ á | é | í | ó | ú | e u | i a ] ;
define C [ b | c | d | ð | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | þ ] ;
define M [ í [ r | l | 0 ] | u [ r | l | 0 ] | o [ r | l | 0 ] | á [ r | l | 0 ] | ó [ r | l | 0 ] | n | m | þ | ð ] ;
define F [ a [ r | l | 0 ] | ú [ r | l | 0 ] | e [ r | l | 0 ] | i [ r | l | 0 ] | é [ r | l | 0 ] | c | q ] ;
define N [ n g | s | k | g | t | d | p | b ] ;
define X [ "@D.PSTFUT@" | "@D.IPFV@" | "@D.SUBJ@" ] ;

# gender adjust: adjusts the ending of the word based on the gender

define GAdj "&" s g g e n -> "^" s || [ M | N ] _ ,,
            "&" s g g e n -> "^" a r || F _ ,,
            "&" [ p l n o m | p l a c c ] -> "*" || [ M | N ] _ ,,
            "&" [ p l n o m | p l a c c ] -> "^" i r || F _ ;

# vowel change: de-diphthongization, raising front vowels, fronting back vowels, and turning i to a
# [ C | C C | [..] ]
define VChange i a -> a || _ C* "*" ,,
               e u -> i || _ C* "*" ,,
               á -> e || _ C* "*" ,,
               é -> i || _ C* "*" ,,
               í -> a || _ C* "*" ,,
               ó -> e || _ C* "*" ,,
               ú -> i || _ C* "*" ,,
               a -> e || _ C* "*" ,,
               e -> i || _ C* "*" ,,
               i -> a || _ C* "*" ,,
               o -> e || _ C* "*" ,,
               u -> i || _ C* "*" ;

# r addition: adds an r on the occurance of two consecutive vowels.

define RAdd i -> r i || [ i | ú | é ] "^" _ ,,
            a -> r a || a "^" _ ;

# u drop: drops u in um suffix when word already ends in u.

define UDrop u m -> m || [ u | á | í | ó ] "^" _ ;

# i add: adds an i when two consecutive final s's.

define IAdd s -> i s || s "^" _ .#. ;

# vowel correction: correct the last vowel in a verb.

define VCorrect [ a | e ] -> u || _ X* "~" [ m | .#. | "^" ] ,,
                [ a | e ] -> i || _ X* "~" ð ,,
                o -> i || _ X* "~" [ m | .#. | "^" ] ,,
                o -> u || _ X* "~" ð ,,
                "~" -> i || [ a | e ] X* "^" ð _ ,,
                "-" -> u || [ a | e ] X* "^" ð _ ,,
                "~" -> u || o X* "^" ð _ ,,
                "-" -> i || o X* "^" ð _ ,,
                "~" -> e || [ a | e ] X* "^" d _ ,,
                "~" -> o || o X* "^" d _ ,,
                "-" -> u || [ a | e ] X* "^" d _ [ m | .#. | "^" ] ,,
                "-" -> i || [ a | e ] X* "^" d _ ð ,,
                "-" -> i || o X* "^" d _ [ m | .#. | "^" ] ,,
                "-" -> u || o X* "^" d _ ð ,,
                a -> e || _ X* "`" [ .#. | r | d | "^" ] ,,
                e -> i || _ X* "`" [ .#. | r | d | "^" ] ,,
                o -> u || _ X* "`" [ .#. | r | d | "^" ] ,,
                [ a | e ] -> o || _ X* "`" "~" ,,
                o -> e || _ X* "`" "~" ;

# cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries

define Cleanup "^" -> 0 ,,
               "*" -> 0 ,,
               "~" -> 0 ,,
               "`" -> 0 ;

read lexc thudiniska.lexc
define Lexicon
define Grammar Lexicon .o. GAdj .o. VChange .o. RAdd .o. IAdd .o. UDrop .o. VCorrect .o. Cleanup ;

regex Grammar ;
